District of Columbia statutes.
33-103.07

Repealed

Actions by and against partnership and partners.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-234, § 307, 44 DCR 777
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(x), 58 DCR 1720
1981 Ed., § 41-153.7.